Vermont, session 2025-2026, H814.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) protect human rights, promote equity, increase efficiency, enhance
accessibility, create transparency, and guarantee accountability in health care
and human services through the ethical and responsible use of artificial
intelligence technology;
(2) maximize the benefits and minimize the risks of the use of artificial
intelligence in health care and human services;
(3) promote the ethical and responsible use of augmented intelligence in
service delivery, coverage determinations, and access to health care and human
services;
(4) prevent harm from the use of augmented and other artificial
intelligence in health care and human services;
(5) improve the experience of patients, providers, and payers through
the use of augmented and other artificial intelligence; and
(6) improve quality of care, drive positive health outcomes, and
cultivate population health through the use of augmented and other artificial
intelligence.
VT LEG #389894 v.1

No. 101 Page 2 of 5
2026
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 42C is added to read:
CHAPTER 42C. NEUROLOGICAL RIGHTS
§ 1891. PURPOSE; INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS
The State of Vermont recognizes that each individual has the right to:
(1) mental and neural data privacy;
(2) the freedom of thought;
(3) nondiscrimination in the development and application of
neurotechnologies;
(4) change an individual’s decision regarding neurotechnology and the
right to determine by what means to change that decision;
(5) be afforded protection from neurotechnological interventions of the
mind and from unauthorized access to or manipulation of an individual’s brain
activity; and
(6) be afforded protection from unauthorized neurotechnological
alterations in mental functions critical to personality.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 5023 is amended to read:
§ 5023. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Advisory Council. There is established the Artificial Intelligence
Advisory Council to provide advice and counsel to the Director of the Division
of Artificial Intelligence with regard to the Division’s responsibilities to review
all aspects of artificial intelligence systems developed, employed, or procured
in State government. The Advisory Council, in consultation with the Director
VT LEG #389894 v.1

No. 101 Page 3 of 5
2026
of the Division, shall also engage in public outreach and education on artificial
intelligence.
(b) Members.
(1) Members. The Advisory Council shall be composed of the
following members:
* * *
(F) one member with experience in the field of ethics and human
rights, appointed by the Governor National Association of Social Workers,
Vermont Chapter;
(G) one member who is an academic at a postsecondary institute,
appointed by the Vermont Academy of Science and Engineering;
(H) the Commissioner of Health Secretary of Human Services or
designee;
(I) one member with experience in health care, appointed by the
Vermont Medical Society;
(J) one member with experience in public education, appointed by
the Vermont-National Education Association;
(K) the Executive Director of Racial Equity or designee; and
(J)(L) the Attorney General or designee;
(M) the State Treasurer or designee; and
(N) one member with relevant knowledge and expertise, appointed
by the Governor.
VT LEG #389894 v.1

No. 101 Page 4 of 5
2026
* * *
(h) Repeal. This section shall be repealed on June 30, 2027 2030.
Sec. 4. RESPONSIBLE AND ETHICAL USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE IN HEALTH CARE, HUMAN SERVICES, AND
EDUCATION; REPORT
(a) The Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council, in coordination with the
Director of the Division of Artificial Intelligence and in consultation with
interested stakeholders, shall:
(1) review guidelines and recommendations from the American Medical
Association, National Association of Social Workers, National Education
Association, and other relevant professional organizations regarding the use of
artificial intelligence in the fields of health care, human services, education,
public participation, and public finance;
(2) research existing and potential uses of artificial intelligence in public
participation processes and in public finance; and
(3) create opportunities for public education and engagement in the
development of artificial intelligence policy.
(b) On or before January 15, 2027, the Artificial Intelligence Advisory
Council, in coordination with the Director of the Division of Artificial
Intelligence, shall submit a written report to the General Assembly:
(1) recommending any additional statutory changes necessary to further
the purposes of this act, including:
VT LEG #389894 v.1

No. 101 Page 5 of 5
2026
(A) protections for neurological rights, protections related to
neurotechnologies, and proposed definitions for relevant terminology;
(B) guidance on the use of generative artificial intelligence by
regulated professions; and
(C) regulating the use of artificial and augmented intelligence in
health insurance utilization review processes;
(2) summarizing any additional ways that government can promote the
ethical and responsible use of artificial intelligence technology in health and
human services and in education;
(3) proposing pilot projects that improve public engagement in public
finance using ethical and responsible artificial intelligence technology; and
(4) identifying any reasons for further delaying or removing the new
2030 sunset of the Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council as set forth in
Sec. 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 18, 2026
VT LEG #389894 v.1